Mississippi, session 2026, HB599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  There is created the Holly Springs Utility Department Board and such board shall consist of the following nine (9) members: (a)  Five (5) members appointed by the governing authority of the City of Holly Springs, Mississippi; (b)  Two (2) members appointed by the Marshall County Board of Supervisors; and (c)  Two (2) members appointed by the Benton County Board of Supervisors. The term of office of the board shall be for four (4) years.  When making initial appointments under this section, the appointing authorities shall stagger the terms of such appointees provided that no initial appointment is made for a period of less than one (1) year nor more than four (4) years; thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four (4) years. The board members shall have the power, authority and duty to manage and control the system or systems of the Holly Springs Utility Department and the supply of the facilities and services thereof, both within and without the limits of the municipality.  Such board members shall be qualified electors of their respective appointing authorities and shall not hold any other county or municipal office for honor or profit.  Such board members shall receive such compensation as may be specified and provided by their respective appointing authorities; however, the compensation for every board member shall be equal regardless of the appointing authority. The appointed authorities are hereby authorized and empowered to require the board members to furnish bonds for the faithful performance of their duties, in the amount as may be deemed proper, and to pay the premiums thereon from the appointing authorities from their respective treasury or the available funds of the system or systems. A board member may be removed for cause by the appointing authority with ratification by a chancery judge. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.